Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3372.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 244.05, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Minimum imprisonment, life sentence. (a) An inmate serving a mandatory life sentence under section 609.106, subdivision 2, or 609.3455, subdivision 2, paragraph (a), must not be given supervised release under this section. (b) Except as provided in paragraph (f), an inmate serving a mandatory life sentence under section 609.185, paragraph (a), clause (3), (5), or (6), deleted text begin or sectiondeleted text end 609.2661, clause (3)new text begin , or 609.78, subdivision 2anew text end ; or Minnesota Statutes 2004, section 609.109, subdivision 3, must not be given supervised release under this section without having served a minimum term of 30 years. (c) Except as provided in paragraph (f), an inmate serving a mandatory life sentence under section 609.385 must not be given supervised release under this section without having served a minimum term of imprisonment of 17 years. (d) An inmate serving a mandatory life sentence under section 609.3455, subdivision 3 or 4, must not be given supervised release under this section without having served the minimum term of imprisonment specified by the court in its sentence. (e) An inmate serving a mandatory life sentence under section 609.106, subdivision 3, or 609.3455, subdivision 2, paragraph (c), must not be given supervised release under this section without having served a minimum term of imprisonment specified in subdivision 4b. (f) An inmate serving a mandatory life sentence for a crime described in paragraph (b) or (c) who was under 18 years of age at the time of the commission of the offense must not be given supervised release under this section without having served a minimum term of imprisonment specified in subdivision 4b. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.78, subdivision 2a, is amended to read: Subd. 2a. Felony offense; reporting fictitious emergency resulting in serious injury. Whoever violates subdivision 2, clause (2), is guilty of a felony and may be sentenced as follows: (1) to new text begin life new text end imprisonment deleted text begin for not more than ten years or to payment of a fine of not more than $20,000, or both,deleted text end if the call triggers an emergency response and, as a result of the response, someone suffers deleted text begin great bodily harm ordeleted text end death; deleted text begin ordeleted text end new text begin (2) to imprisonment for not more than 15 years or to payment of a fine of not more than $30,000, or both, if the call triggers an emergency response and, as a result of the response, someone suffers great bodily harm; or new text end deleted text begin (2)deleted text end new text begin (3)new text end to imprisonment deleted text begin ofdeleted text end new text begin fornew text end not more than three years or to payment of a fine of not more than $10,000, or both, if the call triggers an emergency response and as a result of the response, someone suffers substantial bodily harm. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.78, subdivision 2c, is amended to read: Subd. 2c. Felony offense; reporting fictitious emergency resulting in response to the home of certain officials. Whoever violates subdivision 2, clause (2), is guilty of a felony and may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than deleted text begin one yeardeleted text end new text begin ten yearsnew text end or to payment of a fine of not more than deleted text begin $5,000deleted text end new text begin $20,000new text end , or both, if the person places the call with the intent of prompting an emergency response to the home of: (1) an elected official; (2) a judge as defined in section 609.221, subdivision 6, clause (5); (3) a prosecuting attorney as defined in section 609.221, subdivision 6, clause (4); (4) an employee of a correctional facility as defined in section 241.021, subdivision 1i; or (5) a peace officer as defined in section 626.84, subdivision 1, paragraph (c). new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end